lt-LT: Lopelio krašto apdaila: Išsiuvinėtas kraštas; Užlenktas kraštas; Spuruotas kraštas (specialiai); Karščiu nupjautas kraštas; Lazeriu nupjautas kraštas; Apmėtytas kraštas (overlokuotas); Neapdorotas kraštas; Satino dygsniu siuvinėtas kraštas; Kita
th: การตกแต่งขอบ/ขอบแบบแพทช์: ขอบปัก; ขอบพับ; ขอบรุ่ย (แบบตั้งใจ); ขอบตัดด้วยความร้อน; ขอบตัดด้วยเลเซอร์; ขอบเย็บโพ้ง; ขอบปล่อย; ขอบปักซาติน; อื่นๆ
vi: Viền/cạnh miếng vá hoàn thiện: Viền thêu; Mép gập; Mép tưa (cố ý); Mép cắt nhiệt; Mép cắt laser; Mép vắt sổ; Mép cắt thô; Viền thêu satin; Khác
nl: Patch rand-/kantafwerking: Geborduurde rand; Gevouwen rand; Gerafelde rand (opzettelijk); Hittegesneden rand; Lasergesneden rand; Omgezoomde/gelockte rand; Onbewerkte rand; Satijnsteekrand; Overig
cs: Povrchová úprava okraje/okraje záplaty: Vyšívaný okraj; Skládaný okraj; Otřepený okraj (záměrný); Tepelně oříznutý okraj; Laserem oříznutý okraj; Začištěný okraj (overlock); Nezačištěný okraj; Okraj se saténovým stehem; Ostatní
ja: パッチの縁取り／端の仕上げ: 刺繍縁; 折り返し縁; ほつれ縁（意図的）; ヒートカット縁; レーザーカット縁; メロウ/オーバーロック縁; 切りっぱなし縁; サテンステッチ縁; その他
es: Acabado de borde o borde de parche: Borde bordado; Borde doblado; Borde deshilachado (intencional); Borde cortado con calor; Borde cortado con láser; Borde remallado/sobrehilado; Borde sin rematar; Borde de puntada de satén; Otro
ro-RO: Finisaj al marginii/bordurii peticului: Margine brodată; Margine îndoită; Margine franjurată (intenționat); Margine tăiată la cald; Margine tăiată cu laser; Margine surfilată/festonată; Margine nefinisată; Margine cu cusătură satin; Altele
pt-PT: Acabamento de bordo/borda em patch: Rebordo bordado; Bordo dobrado; Bordo desfiado (intencional); Bordo cortado a quente; Bordo cortado a laser; Bordo chuleado/em overloque; Bordo cru; Rebordo em ponto de cetim; Outro
hr-HR: Završna obrada ruba/krpa: Vezeni rub; Presavijeni rub; Pohabani rub (namjerno); Toplinski rezan rub; Laserski rezan rub; Opšiven rub (merrow/overlock); Neobrađeni rub; Rub sa satenskim bodom; Ostalo
da: Lapkant/kantfinish: Broderet kant; Foldet kant; Flosset kant (tilsigtet); Varmeskåret kant; Laserskåret kant; Overlock-kant; Rå kant; Satinstingskant; Andet
ru: Тип отделки края заплатки: Вышитый край; Подвернутый край; Потрепанный край (декоративный); Термообрезной край; Край лазерной резки; Оверлочный край; Необработанный край; Край гладью; Другое
pt-BR: Patch acabamento de borda/extremidade: Borda bordada; Borda dobrada; Borda desfiada (intencional); Borda com corte térmico; Borda com corte a laser; Borda em overloque; Borda crua; Borda em ponto cheio; Outro
zh-TW: 貼布邊框/邊緣處理: 刺繡邊框; 摺邊; 磨損邊緣 (刻意造型); 熱切邊緣; 雷射切割邊緣; 包邊/拷克邊緣; 毛邊; 緞面繡邊框; 其他
el: Φινίρισμα περιγράμματος/ακμής με μπάλωμα: Κεντητό περίγραμμα; Διπλωμένο άκρο; Ξεφτισμένο άκρο (σκόπιμα); Άκρο κομμένο με θερμότητα; Άκρο κομμένο με λέιζερ; Ρελιαστό/κοπτοραπτικής άκρο; Ακατέργαστο άκρο; Περίγραμμα με σατινέ βελονιά; Άλλο
nb: Kantbehandling for patch: Brodert kant; Brettet kant; Frynsete kant (tilsiktet); Varmekuttet kant; Laserkuttet kant; Overlock-kant; Rå kant; Satengstingkant; Annet
fr: Finition de la bordure de l’écusson: Bordure brodée; Bord plié; Bord effiloché (intentionnel); Bord découpé à chaud; Bord découpé au laser; Bord surjeté/point de bourdon; Bord franc; Bordure au point de satin; Autre
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava okraja/lemu nášivky: Vyšívaný okraj; Zahnutý okraj; Rozstrapkaný okraj (úmyselne); Tepelne odrezaný okraj; Laserom odrezaný okraj; Obnitkovaný okraj; Surový okraj; Okraj so saténovým stehom; Iné
zh-CN: 补丁边框/边缘处理: 刺绣边缘; 折边; 磨毛边缘（做旧）; 热切边缘; 激光切割边缘; 锁边/拷边; 毛边; 缎纹锁缝边缘; 其他
sl-SI: Zaključek roba/obrobe našitka: Vezena obroba; Prepognjen rob; Razcefran rob (namerno); Toplotno odrezan rob; Lasersko odrezan rob; Zarobljen rob (overlock); Surovi rob; Obroba s satenastim vbodom; Drugo
sv: Kantfinish för lapp: Broderad kant; Vikt kant; Fransad kant (avsiktlig); Värmeskuren kant; Laserskuren kant; Overlockad kant; Obearbetad kant; Plattsömskant; Övrigt
pl: Wykończenie obramowania/krawędzi naszywki: Haftowane obramowanie; Złożony brzeg; Strzępiący się brzeg (zamierzony); Krawędź cięta na gorąco; Krawędź cięta laserowo; Brzeg owerlokowy; Surowy brzeg; Obramowanie ściegiem atłasowym; Inne
tr: Yama kenar bitişi: İşlemeli kenar; Katlanmış kenar; Yıpratılmış kenar (kasıtlı); Isıyla kesilmiş kenar; Lazerle kesilmiş kenar; Overloklu kenar; Ham kenar; Saten dikişli kenar; Diğer
en: Patch border/edge finish: Embroidered border; Folded edge; Frayed edge (intentional); Heat-cut edge; Laser-cut edge; Merrowed/overlocked edge; Raw edge; Satin stitch border; Other
de: Rand- bzw. Kantenabschluss des Aufnähers: Gestickter Rand; Gefaltete Kante; Ausgefranste Kante (beabsichtigt); Heiß geschnittene Kante; Lasergeschnittene Kante; Gekettelte Kante / Overlock-Kante; Offene Kante; Plattstich-Rand; Sonstige
it: Finitura del bordo/del bordo della toppa: Bordo ricamato; Bordo ripiegato; Bordo sfilacciato (intenzionale); Bordo tagliato a caldo; Bordo tagliato al laser; Bordo a sopraggitto/tagliacuci; Bordo a taglio vivo; Bordo a punto raso; Altro
ko: 패치 테두리/가장자리 마감: 자수 테두리; 접은 테두리; 닳은 테두리(의도적); 열 절단 테두리; 레이저 절단 테두리; 메로우/오버로크 테두리; 로우 엣지; 새틴 스티치 테두리; 기타
hu: Folt szegélyének/élének eldolgozása: Hímzett szegély; Hajtott szegély; Rojtos szegély (szándékos); Hővel vágott szegély; Lézerrel vágott szegély; Overlock szegély; Vágott szegély; Laposöltéses szegély; Egyéb
fi: Merkin reunan viimeistely: Brodeerattu reuna; Taitettu reuna; Hapsutettu reuna (tarkoituksellinen); Lämpöleikattu reuna; Laserleikattu reuna; Saumattu/huoliteltu reuna; Huolittelematon reuna; Satiiniommelreuna; Muu
bg-BG: Финиш на ръба/канта на лепенката: Бродиран борд; Подгънат ръб; Разнищен ръб (умишлено); Топлинно изрязан ръб; Лазерно изрязан ръб; Оверлог ръб; Необработен ръб; Борд от сатенен бод; Друго